Utah statutes.
53A-26a-201.   Board.
(1)  There is created to assist the State Board of Education the Interpreters
Certification Board consisting of the following 11 members:
(a)  a designee of the director of the Division of Services to the Deaf and
Hard of Hearing (DSDHH) in the Utah State Office of Rehabilitation;
(b)  a designee of the State Board of Regents;
(c)  a designee of the State Board of Education;
(d)  four professional interpreters, recommended by the director of DSDHH; and
(e)  four persons who are hearing impaired, recommended by the director of
DSDHH.
(2) (a)  The State Board of Education shall make all appointments to the
board.
(b)  In making its appointments under Subsections (1)(d) and (e), the State
Board of Education shall give consideration to recommendations by interpreters
for the hearing impaired and members of the hearing impaired community.
(3) (a)  Board members shall serve three-year terms, except that for the
initial terms of board members, three shall serve one-year terms, four shall
serve two-year terms, and four shall serve three-year terms.
(b)  A person may not serve more than two three-year consecutive terms.
(c)  If a vacancy occurs on the board for any other reason than the expiration
of a term, the State Board of Education shall appoint a replacement for the
remainder of the term pursuant to Subsections (1) and (2).
(4)  The State Board of Education may remove any board member for cause, which
shall include misconduct, incompetence, or neglect of duty.
(5)  The board shall elect annually a chair and vice chair from among its
members.
(6)  The board shall meet as often as necessary to accomplish the purposes of
this chapter, but not less than quarterly.
(7)  Board members shall receive compensation for actual and necessary
expenses in connection with their service on the board, but shall not receive
a per diem.
